Hawaii statutes.
§11-353 Anonymous contributions
prohibited. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), no person shall
make an anonymous contribution to any candidate, candidate committee, or
noncandidate committee.

(b) A candidate, candidate committee, or
noncandidate committee shall not knowingly receive, accept, or retain an
anonymous contribution, or report such contribution as an anonymous
contribution, except as provided in this section.

(c) An anonymous contribution shall not be
used or expended by the candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate
committee, but shall be returned to the contributor. If the contributor cannot
be identified, the contribution shall escheat to the Hawaii election campaign
fund.

(d) This section shall not apply to amounts
that aggregate to less than $100 that are received from ten or more persons at
the same political function. The receipt of these contributions shall be
disclosed in a report filed pursuant to sections 11-333 and 11-335. [L 2010, c
211, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 78, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next